Alabama, session 2026rs, HB29.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-6-3, Code of Alabama 1975, is
Page 1

Section 1. Section 13A-6-3, Code of Alabama 1975, is
HB29 INTRODUCED
amended to read as follows:
"§13A-6-3
(a) A person commits the crime of manslaughter if he or
she does any of the following:
(1) Recklessly causes the death of another person.
(2) Causes the death of another person under
circumstances that would constitute murder under Section
13A-6-2; except, that he or she causes the death due to a
sudden heat of passion caused by provocation recognized by
law, and before a reasonable time for the passion to cool and
for reason to reassert itself.
(3)a. Knowingly sells, furnishes, gives away, delivers,
or distributes a controlled substance in violation of Section
13A-12-211, which contains fentanyl, any mixture containing
fentanyl, any synthetic controlled substance fentanyl, or any
synthetic controlled substance fentanyl analogue as described
in Sections 20-2-23 and 20-2-25, and the person to whom the
controlled substance is sold, furnished, given, delivered, or
distributed dies as a proximate result of the use of the
controlled substance; provided, nothing in this subdivision
shall be construed to apply to a licensed physician engaged in
the practice of medicine, a licensed pharmacist engaged in the
practice of pharmacy, or a licensed dentist engaged in the
practice of dentistry.
b. It is not a defense to this subdivision that the
person who sold, furnished, gave away, delivered, or
distributed the controlled substance had no knowledge that the
controlled substance contained fentanyl, any mixture
Page 2

controlled substance contained fentanyl, any mixture
HB29 INTRODUCED
containing fentanyl, any synthetic controlled substance
fentanyl, or any synthetic controlled substance fentanyl
analogue as described in Section 20-2-23 and 20-2-25.
(4)a. Commits the crime of sexual extortion, as
provided under Section 13A-6-241, against a victim under 18
years of age, and both of the following occur:
1. The victim of the crime dies.
2. The finder of fact finds beyond a reasonable doubt
that the sexual extortion of the victim was the proximate
cause of the victim's death.
b. For purposes of this subdivision, the Legislature
finds that for purposes of determining proximate causation, a
victim's suicide shall be deemed to be a foreseeable
consequence of the crime of sexual extortion and shall not be
deemed an independent intervening cause.
(b)(1) ManslaughterExcept as provided in subdivision
(2), manslaughter is a Class B felony.
(2) Manslaughter under subdivision (a)(4) is a Class A
felony."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3